Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1404.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 62 O.S. 2021, Section 34.102, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 34.102. A. There is hereby created in the State


Treasury a revolving fund to be known and designated as the “Revenue


Stabilization Fund”. The fund shall be a continuing fund, not


subject to fiscal year limitations.


B. For determinations made regarding deposits for fiscal years


beginning on or after July 1, 2019, no monies shall be deposited to


the credit of the Revenue Stabilization Fund until such time as the


amount of actual revenue certified by the State Board of

Req. No. 3102 Page 1


Equalization as having been deposited into the General Revenue Fund


for the first fiscal year prior to the beginning of the fiscal year


that deposits to the Revenue Stabilization Fund are first made


equals or exceeds Six Billion Six Hundred Million Dollars


($6,600,000,000.00).


C. Once the provisions prescribed by subsection B of this


section have been met, deposits to the Revenue Stabilization Fund as


prescribed by this section may be made during any subsequent fiscal


year according to the requirements and limitations imposed by this


act this section, Sections 34.103 and 34.104 of this title, and


Sections 1004 and 2352 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


provided that no deposits shall be made during a fiscal year where


the State Board of Equalization General Revenue Fund certification


for said such fiscal year is less than the State Board of


Equalization General Revenue Fund certification for the previous


fiscal year plus an increment equal to the amount otherwise


calculated for deposit pursuant to subsection E of this section.


D. Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section, unless


such deposits are the result of a direct appropriation to the


Revenue Stabilization Fund by the Legislature, no monies shall be


deposited to the credit of the Revenue Stabilization Fund:


1. For any month during a fiscal year after the month during


which the declaration of a revenue failure pursuant to the


provisions of Section 34.49 of this title has been made. For

Req. No. 3102 Page 2


purposes of this subsection, the limitation on deposits to the


Revenue Stabilization Fund shall be imposed for the remaining months


of the fiscal year during which the revenue failure was declared,


but shall not operate as a limitation upon deposits for any


subsequent fiscal year unless a revenue failure is declared at some


time during such fiscal year; or


2. That would cause deposits to the Revenue Stabilization Fund


for the fiscal year to exceed three percent (3%) of the State Board


of Equalization General Revenue Fund certification for that fiscal


year.


E. Except as provided in subsection I J of this section, the


Revenue Stabilization Fund shall consist of:


1. One hundred percent (100%) of the revenue derived from the


gross production tax on oil levied pursuant to Section 1001 of Title


of the Oklahoma Statutes which is in excess of the five-year


average computed as prescribed by Section 34.103 of this title;


2. One hundred percent (100%) of the revenue derived from the


gross production tax on natural gas levied pursuant to Section 1001


of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes which is in excess of the five-


year average computed as prescribed by Section 34.103 of this title;


3. Seventy-five percent (75%) of the revenue derived from


corporate income tax levied pursuant to Section 2355 of Title 68 of


the Oklahoma Statutes which is in excess of the five-year average


computed as prescribed by Section 34.103 of this title; and

Req. No. 3102 Page 3


4. Any amounts appropriated by the Legislature.


F. 1. Except as provided in paragraph 2 of this subsection, in


the event that a revenue failure is declared with respect to the


General Revenue Fund pursuant to Section 34.49 of this title, the


Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise Services may


withdraw up to one-quarter (1/4) of the balance of the Revenue


Stabilization Fund available at the beginning of the fiscal year,


provided the total amount withdrawn shall not exceed the amount of


the declared revenue failure, to in equal proportions reduce or


avoid reductions to agencies for the current fiscal year and to


mitigate potential reductions of funds to be expended by common


school districts which were appropriated or authorized by the


Legislature, but excluding any funds which are apportioned directly


to common school districts.


2. For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2020, in the event that


a revenue failure is declared with respect to the General Revenue


Fund pursuant to Section 34.49 of this title, the Director of the


Office of Management and Enterprise Services may withdraw amounts up


to a total of one-half (1/2) of the highest balance during the


fiscal year ending June 30, 2020, of the Revenue Stabilization Fund;


provided, the total amount withdrawn shall not exceed the amount of


the declared revenue failure less any appropriations made by the


Legislature to offset such revenue failure, to in equal proportions


reduce or avoid reductions to agencies for the fiscal year and to

Req. No. 3102 Page 4


mitigate potential reductions of funds to be expended by common


school districts which were appropriated or authorized by the


Legislature for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2020, but excluding


any funds which are apportioned directly to common school districts.


No monies shall be withdrawn under the provisions of this subsection


for the purpose of reducing or avoiding reductions of appropriations


made pursuant to Section 129 of Enrolled House Bill No. 2765 of the


1st Session of the 57th Oklahoma Legislature or Section 1 of


Enrolled Senate Bill No. 1076 of the 1st Session of the 57th


Oklahoma Legislature.


G. In the event that a revenue failure is declared with respect


to the General Revenue Fund pursuant to Section 34.49 of this title,


the Legislature may appropriate up to one-quarter (1/4) of the


balance of the Revenue Stabilization Fund available at the beginning


of the fiscal year, not to exceed the amount of the revenue failure


as declared with respect to the General Revenue Fund pursuant to


Section 34.49 of this title.


H. 1. In the event of a federal government shutdown of longer


than fifteen (15) days, the Director of the Office of Management and


Enterprise Services may withdraw up to one-quarter (1/4) of the


balance of the Revenue Stabilization Fund available at the beginning


of the fiscal year, provided the total amount withdrawn shall not


exceed the amount of funding required to:



Req. No. 3102 Page 5


a. pay the salaries of state employees who are either


partially or fully paid by federal funds and who have


been furloughed as a result of the federal government


shutdown. Provided, only the portion of salaries


affected by the lapse of federal funds shall be paid


with the balance of the Revenue Stabilization Fund


authorized to be expended pursuant to this subsection,


and


b. pay for the portion of Supplemental Nutrition


Assistance Program benefits to individuals enrolled in


the program that are reduced or eliminated as a result


of the federal government shutdown.


2. Each week in which a federal government shutdown exceeding


fifteen (15) days occurs, the Director of the Office of Management


and Enterprise Services shall prepare and electronically submit a


report to the Governor, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, and


the Speaker of the House of Representatives that contains the


following information:


a. any amount withdrawn from the Revenue Stabilization


Fund pursuant to the provisions of this subsection,


b. the number of state employees who have been furloughed


or have had salaries reduced due to the federal


government shutdown, including the amount of salary


reduction,

Req. No. 3102 Page 6


c. the amount of salaries paid pursuant to the provisions


of this subsection,


d. the number of Supplemental Nutrition Assistance


Program enrollees that have had benefits reduced or


eliminated by the federal shutdown, including the


total amount of benefit reductions, and


e. the amount of benefits paid pursuant to the provisions


of this subsection.


3. If, upon the end of a federal government shutdown, the


federal government provides funds to pay for the portion of salaries


of state employees that were paid pursuant to the provisions of this


section, those funds shall be deposited in the Revenue Stabilization


Fund.


4. If, upon the end of a federal government shutdown, the


federal government provides funds to pay benefits reduced or


eliminated by the federal shutdown that were paid pursuant to the


provisions of this section, those funds shall be deposited in the


Revenue Stabilization Fund.


5. As used in this subsection, “federal government shutdown”


shall mean the same as the term “covered lapse in appropriations” as


defined in 31 U.S.C., Section 1341(c)(1)(A).


I. If the amount of revenue certified by the State Board of


Equalization at its February meeting in any year to be collected in


the General Revenue Fund for the upcoming fiscal year is less than

Req. No. 3102 Page 7


the amount of revenue certified by the State Board of Equalization


to be collected in the General Revenue Fund for the current fiscal


year as determined at its February meeting conducted in the


preceding calendar year, the Legislature may appropriate up to one-


half (1/2) of the balance of the Revenue Stabilization Fund


available at the beginning of the fiscal year; provided, that the


amount withdrawn shall not exceed the amount of the decline in


revenue certified.


I. J. If during the State Board of Equalization certification


process, one or more of the revenue sources identified in paragraphs


1, 2, and 3 of subsection E of this section are forecasted to


experience a revenue decrease, then the total deposits to the


Revenue Stabilization Fund as otherwise calculated under subsection


E of this section shall be reduced in an amount equal to such


revenue decreases. For purposes of this subsection, “revenue


decrease” means an identified revenue source derived in an amount


less than the five-year average for such revenue source.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3102 QD 12/31/2025 2:04:25 AM









Req. No. 3102 Page 8